bg-BG: Тип изходен сигнал: Цифров (CAN шина); Цифров (LIN шина); Цифров (ШИМ); NTC термистор (съпротивление); PTC термистор (съпротивление); Превключвател (вкл./изкл.); Изходно напрежение (аналогово); Друго
hu: Kimeneti jel típusa: Digitális (CAN bus); Digitális (LIN bus); Digitális (PWM); NTC termisztor (ellenállás); PTC termisztor (ellenállás); Kapcsoló (be/ki); Feszültségkimenet (analóg); Egyéb
pl: Typ sygnału wyjściowego: Cyfrowy (szyna CAN); Cyfrowy (szyna LIN); Cyfrowy (PWM); Termistor NTC (rezystancja); Termistor PTC (rezystancja); Przełącznik (wł./wył.); Wyjście napięciowe (analogowe); Inne
zh-CN: 输出信号类型: 数字（CAN 总线）; 数字（LIN 总线）; 数字 (PWM); NTC 热敏电阻（阻值）; PTC 热敏电阻（阻值）; 开关（开/关）; 电压输出（模拟）; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta izlaznog signala: Digitalni (CAN sabirnica); Digitalni (LIN sabirnica); Digitalni (PWM); NTC termistor (otpor); PTC termistor (otpor); Prekidač (uključeno/isključeno); Izlazni napon (analogni); Ostalo
fi: Lähtösignaalin tyyppi: Digitaalinen (CAN-väylä); Digitaalinen (LIN-väylä); Digitaalinen (PWM); NTC-termistori (resistanssi); PTC-termistori (resistanssi); Kytkin (on/off); Jännitelähtö (analoginen); Muu
sk-SK: Typ výstupného signálu: Digitálny (zbernica CAN); Digitálny (zbernica LIN); Digitálny (PWM); NTC termistor (odporový); PTC termistor (odporový); Spínač (zap/vyp); Napäťový výstup (analógový); Iné
de: Typ des Ausgangssignals: Digital (CAN-Bus); Digital (LIN-Bus); Digital (PWM); NTC-Thermistor (Widerstand); PTC-Thermistor (Widerstand); Schalter (Ein/Aus); Spannungsausgang (Analog); Sonstige
fr: Type de signal de sortie: Numérique (bus CAN); Numérique (bus LIN); Numérique (PWM); Thermistance CTN (résistance); Thermistance CTP (résistance); Interrupteur (marche/arrêt); Sortie de tension (analogique); Autre
pt-BR: Sinal de saída tipo: Digital (barramento CAN); Digital (barramento LIN); Digital (PWM); Termistor NTC (resistência); Termistor PTC (resistência); Interruptor (liga/desliga); Saída de tensão (analógica); Outros
pt-PT: Tipo de sinal de saída: Digital (barramento CAN); Digital (barramento LIN); Digital (PWM); Termístor NTC (resistência); Termístor PTC (resistência); Interruptor (ligar/desligar); Saída de tensão (analógica); Outro
tr: Çıkış sinyali tipi: Dijital (CAN veriyolu); Dijital (LIN veriyolu); Dijital (PWM); NTC termistör (direnç); PTC termistör (direnç); Anahtar (açık/kapalı); Voltaj çıkışı (analog); Diğer
nb: Utgangssignaltype: Digitalt (CAN-buss); Digitalt (LIN-buss); Digitalt (PWM); NTC-termistor (motstand); PTC-termistor (motstand); Bryter (av/på); Spenningsutgang (analog); Annet
it: Tipo di segnale di uscita: Digitale (CAN bus); Digitale (LIN bus); Digitale (PWM); Termistore NTC (resistenza); Termistore PTC (resistenza); Interruttore (on/off); Uscita in tensione (analogica); Altro
zh-TW: 輸出訊號類型: 數位 (CAN 匯流排); 數位 (LIN 匯流排); 數位 (PWM); NTC 熱敏電阻 (電阻); PTC 熱敏電阻 (電阻); 開關 (開啟/關閉); 電壓輸出 (類比); 其他
cs: Typ výstupního signálu: Digitální (sběrnice CAN); Digitální (sběrnice LIN); Digitální (PWM); Termistor NTC (odpor); Termistor PTC (odpor); Spínač (zapnuto/vypnuto); Napěťový výstup (analogový); Ostatní
da: Type af outputsignal: Digital (CAN-bus); Digital (LIN-bus); Digital (PWM); NTC-termistor (modstand); PTC-termistor (modstand); Kontakt (tænd/sluk); Spændingsudgang (analog); Andet
ro-RO: Tip de semnal de ieșire: Digital (magistrală CAN); Digital (magistrală LIN); Digital (PWM); Termistor NTC (rezistență); Termistor PTC (rezistență); Comutator (pornit/oprit); Ieșire de tensiune (analogică); Altele
sv: Utgångssignaltyp: Digital (CAN-buss); Digital (LIN-buss); Digital (PWM); NTC-termistor (resistans); PTC-termistor (resistans); Brytare (på/av); Spänningsutgång (analog); Övrigt
vi: Loại tín hiệu đầu ra: Kỹ thuật số (CAN bus); Kỹ thuật số (LIN bus); Kỹ thuật số (PWM); Điện trở nhiệt NTC (điện trở); Điện trở nhiệt PTC (điện trở); Công tắc (bật/tắt); Đầu ra điện áp (analog); Khác
ru: Тип выходного сигнала: Цифровой (шина CAN); Цифровой (шина LIN); Цифровой (ШИМ); NTC термистор (сопротивление); PTC термистор (сопротивление); Переключатель (вкл/выкл); Выходное напряжение (аналоговое); Другое
en: Output signal type: Digital (CAN bus); Digital (LIN bus); Digital (PWM); NTC thermistor (resistance); PTC thermistor (resistance); Switch (on/off); Voltage output (analog); Other
nl: Uitgangssignaal type: Digitaal (CAN-bus); Digitaal (LIN-bus); Digitaal (PWM); NTC-thermistor (weerstand); PTC-thermistor (weerstand); Schakelaar (aan/uit); Spanningsuitgang (analoog); Overige
sl-SI: Vrsta izhodnega signala: Digitalni (vodilo CAN); Digitalni (vodilo LIN); Digitalni (PWM); Termistor NTC (upor); Termistor PTC (upor); Stikalo (vklop/izklop); Napetostni izhod (analogni); Drugo
es: Tipo de señal de salida: Digital (bus CAN); Digital (bus LIN); Digital (PWM); Termistor NTC (resistencia); Termistor PTC (resistencia); Interruptor (encendido/apagado); Salida de voltaje (analógica); Otro
el: Τύπος σήματος εξόδου: Ψηφιακό (δίαυλος CAN); Ψηφιακό (δίαυλος LIN); Ψηφιακό (PWM); Θερμίστορ NTC (αντίσταση); Θερμίστορ PTC (αντίσταση); Διακόπτης (ενεργοποίηση/απενεργοποίηση); Έξοδος τάσης (αναλογική); Άλλο
ja: 出力信号タイプ: デジタル (CANバス); デジタル (LINバス); デジタル (PWM); NTCサーミスタ (抵抗); PTCサーミスタ (抵抗); スイッチ (オン/オフ); 電圧出力 (アナログ); その他
lt-LT: Išvesties signalo tipas: Skaitmeninis (CAN magistralė); Skaitmeninis (LIN magistralė); Skaitmeninis (PWM); NTC termistorius (varža); PTC termistorius (varža); Jungiklis (įjungti / išjungti); Įtampos išvestis (analoginė); Kita
th: ประเภทสัญญาณเอาต์พุต: ดิจิทัล (CAN bus); ดิจิทัล (LIN bus); ดิจิทัล (PWM); NTC เทอร์มิสเตอร์ (ความต้านทาน); PTC เทอร์มิสเตอร์ (ความต้านทาน); สวิตช์ (เปิด/ปิด); เอาต์พุตแรงดันไฟฟ้า (แอนะล็อก); อื่นๆ
ko: 출력 신호 유형: 디지털(CAN 버스); 디지털(LIN 버스); 디지털(PWM); NTC 서미스터(저항); PTC 서미스터(저항); 스위치(켜기/끄기); 전압 출력(아날로그); 기타